Utah statutes.
20A-1-603.   Fraud, interference, disturbance -- Tampering with ballots or records -- Penalties.

(1) (a)  A person may not fraudulently vote on behalf of himself or another, by:

(i)  voting more than once at any one election;

(ii)  knowingly handing in two or more ballots folded together;

(iii)  changing any ballot after it has been cast or deposited in the ballot box;

(iv)  adding or attempting to add any ballot or vote to those legally polled at any election by fraudulently introducing the ballot or vote into the ballot box or vote tally, either before or after the ballots have been counted;

(v)  adding to or mixing or attempting to add or mix, other ballots with the ballots lawfully polled while those ballots are being counted or canvassed, or at any other time; or

(vi)  voting in a voting district or precinct when the person knew or should have known that the person was not eligible for voter registration in that district or precinct, unless the person is legally entitled to vote the ballot under Section 20A-4-107 or another provision of this title.

(b)  A person may not fraudulently interfere with an election by:

(i)  willfully detaining, mutilating, or destroying any election returns;

(ii)  in any manner, interfering with the officers holding an election or conducting a canvass, or with the voters lawfully exercising their rights of voting at an election, so as to prevent the election or canvass from being fairly held or lawfully conducted;

(iii)  engaging in riotous conduct at any election, or interfering in any manner with any election official in the discharge of the election official's duties;

(iv)  inducing any election officer, or officer whose duty it is to ascertain, announce, or declare the result of any election or to give or make any certificate, document, or evidence in relation to any election, to violate or refuse to comply with the election officer's duty or any law regulating the election officer's duty;

(v)  taking, carrying away, concealing, removing, or destroying any ballot, pollbook, or other thing from a polling place, or from the possession of the person authorized by law to have the custody of that thing; or

(vi)  aiding, counseling, providing, procuring, advising, or assisting any person to do any of the acts specified in this section.

(2)  In addition to the penalties established in Section 20A-1-609, a person who commits an offense under Subsection (1) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 276, 2008 General Session

